Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 12. Kinds of Insurance, Limits of Risk, and Reinsurance.
Sec. 21.12.025.
Assumption reinsurance.

A nondomestic admitted insurer may not carry out an agreement of assumption reinsurance with a nonadmitted insurer that would transfer Alaska policyholders unless

the nonadmitted insurer applies for and obtains a certificate of authority from the director; or

the admitted insurer files the assumption agreement with the director and obtains approval to apply the assumption agreement to Alaska policies or certificates.

The director shall approve an assumption agreement involving the assumption of Alaska insurance business by a nonadmitted insurer if

the ceding insurer is in supervision, conservation, or liquidation and the assuming insurer is in good standing in its state of domicile; or

approval would be in the public interest of the Alaska policyholders.

History.

(§ 15 ch 96 SLA 2004)

Sec. 21.12.030.
Definitions not mutually exclusive.

It is intended that certain insurance coverages may come within the definitions of two or more kinds of insurance as defined in this chapter, and the inclusion of coverage within one definition does not exclude it from the definition of another kind of insurance coverage if the coverage may be reasonably included.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.12.040.
Life insurance defined.

Life insurance is insurance on human lives.
The transaction of life insurance includes also the granting of endowment benefits, additional benefits for death or dismemberment by accident or accidental means, additional benefits for the insured’s disability, and optional modes of settlement of proceeds of life insurance. Transaction of life insurance does not include workers’ compensation insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 5.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, §§ 11-17.

Sec. 21.12.050.
Health and health care insurance defined.

Health insurance is insurance of human beings (1) against bodily injury, disablement, or death by accident or accidental means; (2) against the resulting expenses of the injury, disablement, or death; (3) against disablement or expense resulting from sickness or childbirth; (4) against expense incurred in prevention of sickness; (5) for dental care; and (6) including every insurance that applies to injury, disablement, or death. Transaction of health insurance includes disability insurance and stop-loss insurance but does not include workers’ compensation insurance. Health care insurance described in (b) of this section is a type of health insurance under this subsection.

Health care insurance means that part of health insurance that provides, delivers, arranges for, pays for, or reimburses any of the costs of medical care.

In this section, “stop-loss insurance” means insurance purchased by a self-insured employer to cover benefits the employer incurs in excess of a preset limit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 56 SLA 1996; am §§ 11, 12 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 28 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, § 7.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, § 5.

Sec. 21.12.052.
Disability insurance defined.

Disability insurance is insurance that provides periodic income payments when income is interrupted or terminated because of disability resulting from sickness, injury, or dismemberment, or a combination of sickness, injury, or dismemberment.

History.

(§ 8 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Sec. 21.12.055.
Annuities and annuity contract defined.

Annuities means all agreements to make periodical payments if the making or continuance of all or some of a series of payments or the amount of a payment is dependent upon the continuance of human life, except payments made under AS

21.12.040

. The business of annuities is considered to include additional benefits operating to safeguard the contract from lapse, or to provide a special surrender value, or special benefit, or annuity, in the event of the total and permanent disability of the holder.

Annuity contract means a contract providing for an annuity as defined in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.12.060.
Property insurance defined.

Property insurance is insurance on real or personal property of every kind and of every interest therein, whether on land, water, or in the air, against loss or damage from any and all hazard or cause, and against loss consequential upon the loss or damage, other than noncontractual legal liability for loss or damage.
Property insurance does not include title insurance as defined in AS

21.66.480

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, “AS

21.66.480

” was substituted for “AS

21.12.100

” to correct a manifest error in ch. 120, SLA 1974.

Administrative Code. —

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Sec. 21.12.070.
Casualty insurance defined.

Casualty insurance includes

vehicle insurance: insurance against loss of or damage to a land vehicle or aircraft or a draft or riding animal or to property while contained therein or thereon or being loaded or unloaded therein or therefrom, from any hazard or cause, and against any loss, liability, or expense resulting from or incidental to ownership, maintenance, or use of the vehicle, aircraft, or animal; and provision for medical, hospital, surgical, disability benefits to injured persons and funeral and death benefits to dependents, beneficiaries, or personal representatives of persons killed, irrespective of legal liability to the insured, if issued as an incidental coverage with or supplemental to insurance on the vehicle, aircraft, or animal;

liability insurance: insurance against legal liability for the death, injury or disability of a human being, or for damage to property; and provision of medical, hospital, surgical, disability benefits to injured persons and funeral and death benefits to dependents, beneficiaries or personal representatives of persons killed, irrespective of legal liability of the insured, if issued as an incidental coverage with or supplemental to liability insurance;

workers’ compensation and employer’s liability: insurance of the obligations accepted by, imposed upon, or assumed by employers under law for death, disablement, or injury of employees;

burglary and theft: insurance against loss or damage by burglary, theft, larceny, robbery, forgery, fraud, vandalism, malicious mischief, confiscation, or wrongful conversion, disposal, or concealment, or from an attempt at any of the foregoing; including supplemental coverage for medical, hospital, surgical, and funeral expense incurred by the named insured or any other person as a result of bodily injury during the commission of a burglary, robbery, or theft by another; also insurance against loss of or damage to money, coins, bullion, securities, notes, drafts, acceptances, or other valuable papers and documents, resulting from any cause;

personal property floater: insurance upon personal effects against loss or damage from any cause under a personal property floater;

glass: insurance against loss or damage to glass, including its lettering, ornamentation, and fittings;

boiler and machinery: insurance against any liability and loss or damage to property or interest resulting from accident to or explosions of boilers, pipes, pressure containers, machinery, or apparatus, and to make inspection of and issue certificates of inspection upon boilers, machinery, and apparatus of any kind, whether or not insured;

leakage and fire extinguishing equipment: insurance against loss or damage to any property or interest caused by the breakage or leakage of sprinklers, hoses, pumps, and other fire extinguishing equipment or apparatus, water pipes or containers, or by water entering through leaks or openings in buildings, and insurance against loss or damage to the sprinklers, hoses, pumps, and other fire extinguishing equipment or apparatus;

credit: insurance against loss or damage resulting from failure of debtors to pay their obligations to the insured;

malpractice: insurance against legal liability of the insured, and against loss, damage, or expense incidental to a claim of liability, and including medical, hospital, surgical, and funeral benefits to injured persons, irrespective of legal liability of the insured, arising out of the death, injury or disablement of a person, or arising out of damage to the economic interest of a person, as the result of negligence in rendering expert, fiduciary, or professional service;

elevator: insurance against loss of or damage to any property of the insured, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, or use of elevators, except loss or damage by fire, and to make inspection of and issue certificates of inspection on elevators;

livestock: insurance against loss or damage to livestock, and services of a veterinary for the animals;

entertainments: insurance indemnifying the producer of a motion picture, television, radio, theatrical, sport, spectacle, entertainment, or similar production, event, or exhibition against loss from interruption, postponement, or cancellation due to death, accidental injury, or sickness of performers, participants, directors, or other principals;

miscellaneous: insurance against any other kind of loss, damage, or liability properly a subject of insurance and not within another kind of insurance as defined in this chapter, if the insurance is not disapproved by the director as being contrary to law or public policy.

The provision of medical, hospital, surgical, and funeral benefits, and of coverage against accidental death or injury, as incidental to and part of other insurance defined in (a)(1), (2), (4), and (10) of this section, shall for all purposes be considered to be the same kind of insurance to which it is incidental, and is not subject to provisions of this title applicable to life or health insurance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 9 ch 56 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For appointment of casualty insurer inspectors as special boiler inspectors, see AS

18.60.240

.

Administrative Code. —

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 1 to 28.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, § 6.

Liability insurance coverage for violations of antipollution laws. 87 ALR4th 444.

Who is executive officer of insured within liability insurance policy. 1 ALR5th 132.

Homeowner’s liability insurance coverage of emotional distress allegedly inflicted on third party by insured. 8 ALR5th 254.

Sec. 21.12.080.
Surety insurance defined.

Surety insurance includes

fidelity insurance, which is insurance guaranteeing the fidelity of persons holding positions of public or private trust;

insurance guaranteeing the performance of contracts, other than insurance policies, and guaranteeing and executing bonds, undertakings, and contracts of suretyship;

insurance indemnifying banks, bankers, brokers, financial or moneyed corporations or associations against loss, resulting from any cause, of bills of exchange, notes, bonds, securities, evidences of debt, deeds, mortgages, warehouse receipts or other valuable papers, documents, money, precious metals and articles made therefrom, jewelry, watches, necklaces, bracelets, gems, precious and semiprecious stones, including loss while being transported in armored motor vehicles or by messenger, but not including any other risks of transportation or navigation; also insurance against loss or damage to an insured’s premises or to the furnishings, fixtures, equipment, safes, and vaults on an insured’s premises caused by burglary, robbery, theft, vandalism, or malicious mischief, or attempted burglary, robbery, theft, vandalism, or malicious mischief.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For schedule and individual risk rating plans, see 3 AAC 29, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

35A Am. Jur. 2d, Fidelity Bonds and Insurance, §§ 1 to 32.

Sec. 21.12.090.
Marine, wet marine, and transportation insurance defined.

“Marine insurance” includes

insurance against any and all kinds of loss or damage to

vessels, craft, aircraft, cars, automobiles, and vehicles of every kind, as well as all goods, freights, cargoes, merchandise, effects, disbursements, profits, money, bullion, precious stones, securities, choses in action, evidences of debt, valuable papers, bottomry and respondentia interests and all other kinds of property and interests therein, in respect to, appertaining to, or in connection with any and all risks or perils of navigation, transit, or transportation, including war risks, on or under any seas or other waters, on land or in the air, or while being assembled, packed, crated, baled, compressed, or similarly prepared for shipment or while awaiting shipment or during delays, storage, transshipment, or reshipment incident thereto, including marine builder’s risks and all personal property floater risks;

a person or to property in connection with or appertaining to a marine, inland marine, transit or transportation insurance, including liability for loss of or damage to either, arising out of or in connection with the construction, repair, operation, maintenance, or use of the subject matter of the insurance (but not including life insurance or surety bonds or insurance against loss by reason of bodily injury to the person arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or use of automobiles);

precious stones, jewels, jewelry, gold, silver, and other precious metals, whether used in business or trade or otherwise and whether in the course of transportation or otherwise;

bridges, tunnels, and other instrumentalities of transportation and communication (excluding buildings, their furniture and furnishings, fixed contents and supplies held in storage) unless fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion, earthquake, riot and/or civil commotion are the only hazards to be covered; piers, wharves, docks and slips, excluding the risks of fire, tornado, sprinkler leakage, hail, explosion, earthquake, riot and/or civil commotion; other aids to navigation and transportation, including dry docks and marine railways, against all risks;

“marine protection and indemnity insurance”, meaning insurance against, or against legal liability of the insured for loss, damage, or expense arising out of, or incident to, the ownership, operation, chartering, maintenance, use, repair, or construction of a vessel, craft, or instrumentality in use in ocean or inland waterways, including liability of the insured for personal injury, illness, or death or for loss of or damage to the property of another person.

For the purposes of this title, “wet marine and transportation” insurance is that part of marine insurance that includes only

insurance on vessels, crafts, and hulls, and insurance of interests in or with relation to vessels, crafts, and hulls;

insurance of marine builder’s risks, marine war risks, and contracts of marine protection and indemnity insurance;

insurance of freights and disbursements pertaining to a subject of insurance coming within this section; or

insurance of personal property and interests in personal property, in the course of exportation from or importation into any country, and in the course of transportation coastwise or on inland waters, including transportation by land, water, or air from point of origin to final destination, in respect to, appertaining to, or in connection with, any and all risks or perils of navigation, transit, or transportation, and while being prepared for and while awaiting shipment, and during delays, storage, transshipment, or reshipment incident thereto.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 15 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, in (b)(2), “contracts of marine protection” was substituted for “contracts or marine protection” to correct a manifest error in ch. 120, SLA 1966.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (b)(1), inserted “and” preceding “hulls”, inserted “insurance” preceding “of interests”; made related and stylistic changes.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A court would probably be more likely to classify pollution liability policies for tankers and barges as “marine insurance” or “wet marine and transportation insurance” than as “liability insurance” or “miscellaneous insurance” and, therefore, they should be eligible for the lower rate of taxation specified in AS

21.09.210(d)

. July 25, 1989, Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

43 Am. Jur. 2d, Insurance, §§ 642 to 662.

44 C.J.S., Insurance, § 18.

Sec. 21.12.100.
Title insurance defined. [Repealed, §
8 ch 120 SLA 1974. For current law see AS 21.66.480.]

Sec. 21.12.110.
Mortgage guaranty insurance defined.

Mortgage guaranty insurance includes insurance against financial loss by reason of nonpayment of principal, interest, and other sums agreed to be paid under the terms of any note or bond or other evidence of indebtedness secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument consisting of a lien or charge on real estate.

History.

(§ 5 ch 206 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.12.120.
[Renumbered as AS 21.12.020(i).]

Sec. 21.12.130.
Commercial insurance defined.

Commercial insurance is any line of property insurance, as defined in AS

21.12.060

, or casualty insurance, as defined in AS

21.12.070

, that is for business and professional interests, whether for profit, nonprofit, or public in nature. For purposes of filing rates under AS

21.39.040

and forms under AS

21.42.120

, commercial insurance does not include workers’ compensation insurance.

History.

(§ 2 ch 81 SLA 2001)